Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4213
Net loss, defined.

Net loss means the excess of incurred claims plus expenses over the sum of written and renewed premiums and other appropriate revenue.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 17.